Illinois, session 104th, HB1.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Prevention of Use of Hemp Cannabinoid Products Intended for 6Human Consumption by Ingestion or Inhalation by Persons Under 721 Years of Age Act. 8    Section 5. Definitions. In this Act:9    "Cannabinoid menu item" means a restaurant-type food that 10incorporates ready-to-eat cannabinoids included on a menu or 11menu board or offered as a food on display.12    "Hemp business establishment" means a hemp retailer or 13hemp food establishment.14    "Hemp cannabinoid" means the chemical constituents of hemp 15plants that are naturally occurring and biologically active.16    "Hemp cannabinoid product" means a finished product for 17sale to hemp cannabinoid users at hemp business establishments 18within the State that contains cannabinoids derived from hemp 19and is intended for human consumption by inhalation or 20ingestion.21    "Hemp cannabinoid user" means a member of the general 22public who buys or uses hemp and who is protected by laws 23against unfair or fraudulent practices in the marketplace.  HB0001- 2 -LRB104 03394 BDA 13416 b1    "Hemp food establishment" means a facility regulated by 2the Department of Public Health that incorporates intermediate 3hemp products in the manufacturing, processing, or preparation 4of prepackaged or ready-to-eat hemp cannabinoid products for 5human ingestion and which meets the requirements of this Act.6    "Hemp retailer" means a retailer operated by an 7organization or business that is licensed by the Department of 8Financial and Professional Regulation to sell hemp cannabinoid 9products to hemp cannabinoid users.10    "Ingestion" means the process of consuming cannabinoid 11products through the mouth, whether by swallowing into the 12gastrointestinal system or through tissue absorption.13    "Inhalation" means the process of consuming cannabinoid 14products through the mouth or nasal passage into the 15respiratory system. 16    "Intermediate hemp products" means products that are made 17from processed hemp that may only be sold to hemp business 18establishments to be used as ingredients for other 19intermediate hemp products or final hemp cannabinoid products 20for human consumption by ingestion or inhalation. 21"Intermediate hemp products" include products that contain 22more than 0.3% THC.23    "Menu" means the primary writing of the establishment from 24which a customer makes an order selection, including, but not 25limited to, breakfast, lunch, and dinner menus, dessert menus, 26beverage menus, other specialty menus, electronic menus, menu   HB0001- 3 -LRB104 03394 BDA 13416 b1boards, and menus published on the Internet.2    "Ready-to-eat hemp cannabinoid product" means a type of 3hemp cannabinoid product that is available for human 4consumption, that is subject to time or temperature control, 5or both, for food safety, that is "ready-to-eat food" as 6defined in Section 1-201.10 of the Food Code 2017 of the United 7States Public Health Service of the Food and Drug 8Administration, that does not exceed 50 milligrams of THC per 9serving, that utilizes intermediate hemp products as an input, 10and that is produced as a single serving in a retail food 11establishment. 12    Section 10. Sale of hemp cannabinoid products. 13    (a) The retail sale of hemp cannabinoids is allowed as 14provided in this Act. 15    (b) No person shall sell or offer for sale hemp 16cannabinoid products to consumers in the State unless the 17person applies for and holds a hemp retailer license issued by 18the Department of Financial and Professional Regulation. No 19person shall sell ready-to-eat hemp products to end consumers 20without holding a hemp food establishment license issued by 21the Department of Public Health.22    (c) A hemp food establishment that sells ready-to-eat 23cannabinoid products shall be exclusively licensed and located 24in the State. 25    (d) No person shall sell a hemp cannabinoid product to any   HB0001- 4 -LRB104 03394 BDA 13416 b1person under the age of 21. 2    (e) No person shall sell, buy for, distribute samples of, 3or furnish any cannabinoid product to any person under the age 4of 21. 5    (f) No person under 21 years of age in the furtherance or 6facilitation of obtaining hemp cannabinoid products shall 7display or use a false or forged identification card or 8transfer, alter, or deface an identification card.9    (g) A hemp food establishment or hemp retailer that sells 10cannabinoid products intended for inhalation shall post a 11clear and conspicuous sign directly adjacent to the display of 12the product that states the following: "THE SALE OF 13CANNABINOID PRODUCTS INTENDED FOR INHALATION TO PERSONS UNDER 14THE AGE OF 21 IS PROHIBITED. PROOF OF AGE IS REQUIRED FOR 15PURCHASE.".16    (h) Cannabinoid products may not be mailed, shipped, or 17otherwise delivered to a purchaser unless, before the delivery 18to the purchaser, the hemp retailer obtains confirmation that 19the purchaser is 21 years of age or older.20    (i) Hemp food establishments and hemp retailers shall 21require proof of age from a purchaser of any cannabinoid 22products before selling the product to that person. Hemp food 23establishments and hemp retailers shall exercise diligence in 24the management and supervision of their premises and in the 25supervision and training of their employees to prevent the 26underage sale of these products.  HB0001- 5 -LRB104 03394 BDA 13416 b1    (j) A product containing cannabinoids must not be 2considered adulterated or unsafe solely because the product 3contains cannabinoids or other material extracted or derived 4from hemp plants.5    (k) A person, hemp food establishment, or hemp retailer 6that violates subsection (e) is guilty of a Class 4 felony. A 7person under the age of 21 who violates subsection (f) is 8guilty of a Class A misdemeanor. 9    Section 15. Licensing and regulation of hemp retailers. 10    (a) The Department of Financial and Professional 11Regulation shall administer and enforce the provisions of this 12Act relating to licensing and oversight of hemp distributors 13and hemp retailers unless otherwise provided in this Act.14    (b) No person shall operate a hemp retail establishment 15for the purpose of serving purchasers of hemp cannabinoid 16products without a license issued under this Act by the 17Department of Financial and Professional Regulation.18    (c) Subject to the provisions of this Act, the Department 19of Financial and Professional Regulation may exercise the 20following powers and duties:21        (1) prescribe forms to be issued for the 22    administration and enforcement of this Act;23        (2) examine, inspect, and investigate the premises, 24    operations, and records of hemp retail organization 25    applicants and licensees;  HB0001- 6 -LRB104 03394 BDA 13416 b1        (3) conduct investigations of possible violations of 2    this Act pertaining to hemp retail organizations; and3        (4) conduct hearings on proceedings to refuse to issue 4    or renew licenses or to revoke, suspend, place on 5    probation, reprimand, or otherwise discipline a license 6    holder under this Act or take other nondisciplinary 7    action.8    (d) The Department of Financial and Professional 9Regulation may not limit the number of hemp retailer licenses. 10    (e) The Department of Financial and Professional 11Regulation may not limit the number of hemp retailer licenses 12an individual may hold.13    (f) Applicants for a hemp retail license must submit all 14information required by the Department of Financial and 15Professional Regulation. Failure by an applicant to submit all 16required information may result in the application being 17disqualified.18    (g) The Department of Financial and Professional 19Regulation may verify information contained in each 20application and accompanying documentation to assess the 21applicant's veracity and fitness to operate a hemp business 22establishment. 23    (h) The Department of Financial and Professional 24Regulation may refuse to issue a license to any applicant who:25        (1) fails to disclose or states falsely any 26    information called for in the applications;  HB0001- 7 -LRB104 03394 BDA 13416 b1        (2) has been found guilty of a violation of this Act, 2    who has had any disciplinary order entered against it by 3    the Department of Financial and Professional Regulation, 4    who has entered into a disciplinary or nondisciplinary 5    agreement with the Department of Financial and 6    Professional Regulation, or whose hemp business license 7    was suspended, restricted, revoked, or denied in another 8    State; or9        (3) has engaged in a pattern or practice of unfair or 10    illegal practices, methods, or activities in the conduct 11    of owning a hemp business establishment or other business.12    (i) The Department of Financial and Professional 13Regulation shall deny the license if any principal officer, 14board member, or persons having a financial or voting interest 15of 5% or greater on the license is delinquent in filing any 16required tax returns or paying any amounts owed to the State.17    (j) The Department of Financial and Professional 18Regulation shall verify an applicant's compliance with the 19requirements of this Act and rules before issuing a hemp 20retailer license. 21    Section 20. Operational requirements of hemp retailers. 22    (a) A hemp retailer shall operate in accordance with the 23representations made in its application and license materials. 24It shall be in compliance with this Act and rules.25    (b) A hemp retailer that obtains a hemp food establishment   HB0001- 8 -LRB104 03394 BDA 13416 b1license may prepare and sell ready-to-eat hemp cannabinoid 2products.3    (c) A hemp retailer shall maintain compliance with State 4and local building, fire, and zoning requirements and 5regulations. 6    (d) A hemp retailer's license allows for a hemp retailer 7to be operated only at a single location.8    (e) A hemp retailer shall ensure that any building or 9equipment used by the hemp retailer for the sale of hemp, hemp 10cannabinoid products, and ready-to-eat hemp cannabinoid 11products are maintained in a clean and sanitary condition.12    (f) A hemp retailer's premises shall be free from 13infestation by insects, rodents, or pests.14    (g) A hemp retailer license shall not give the licensee 15the right to:16        (1) grow hemp;17        (2) produce or manufacture hemp or hemp cannabinoid 18    products;19        (3) sell hemp cannabinoid products to a purchaser 20    unless the purchaser is a medical patient or that the 21    purchaser has been verified to be 21 years of age or older; 22    or23        (4) violate any other requirements or prohibitions set 24    by Department of Financial and Professional Regulation 25    rules.26    (h) A hemp retailer license may be obtained by an   HB0001- 9 -LRB104 03394 BDA 13416 b1out-of-state entity if:2        (1) the applicant and its principals and officers on 3    the application retain a registered agent or office in the 4    State and agree to submit to tax nexus within the State for 5    jurisdictional, regulatory, and enforcement purposes; and6        (2) the applicant maintains a log of all sales to 7    residents located within the State to be submitted for 8    inspection by the Department. 9    Section 25. Regulation of hemp food establishments. 10    (a) As used in this Section, "Department" means the 11Department of Public Health. 12    (b) The Department shall administer and enforce the 13provisions of this Act relating to the licensing and oversight 14of hemp food establishments unless otherwise provided in this 15Act.16    (c) No person shall operate a hemp food establishment for 17the purpose of serving hemp cannabinoid products for human 18ingestion or ready-to-eat hemp cannabinoid products without a 19license issued under this Act.20    (d) Subject to the provisions of this Act, the Department 21may exercise the following powers and duties: 22        (1) prescribe forms to be issued for the 23    administration and enforcement of this Act; 24        (2) examine, inspect, and investigate the premises, 25    operations, and records of hemp food establishment   HB0001- 10 -LRB104 03394 BDA 13416 b1    applicants and licensees;2        (3) conduct investigations of possible violations of 3    this Act pertaining to hemp food establishments; and4        (4) conduct hearings on proceedings to refuse to issue 5    or renew licenses or to revoke, suspend, place on 6    probation, reprimand, or otherwise discipline a license 7    holder under this Act or take other nondisciplinary 8    action.9    (e) The Department may not limit the number of hemp food 10establishment licenses.11    (f) The Department shall not limit the number of licenses 12an individual may hold. Applicants for a hemp food 13establishment license must submit all information required by 14the Department. Failure by an applicant to submit all required 15information may result in the application being disqualified. 16    (g) The Department may verify information contained in 17each application and accompanying documentation to assess the 18applicant's veracity and fitness to operate a hemp food 19establishment.20    (h) The Department may refuse to issue an authorization to 21any applicant who:22        (1) fails to disclose or falsifies any information 23    called for in the application;24        (2) has been found guilty of a violation of this Act, 25    who has had any disciplinary order entered against the 26    applicant by the Department, who has entered into a   HB0001- 11 -LRB104 03394 BDA 13416 b1    disciplinary or nondisciplinary agreement with the 2    Department, or whose hemp business establishment license 3    was suspended, restricted, revoked, or denied in another 4    state; or5        (3) has engaged in a pattern or practice of unfair or 6    illegal practices, methods, or activities in the conduct 7    of owning a hemp business establishment or other business.8    (i) The Department shall deny the license if any principal 9officer, board member, or persons having a financial or voting 10interest of 5% or greater on the license is delinquent in 11filing any required tax returns or paying any amounts owed to 12the State. 13    (j) The Department shall verify an applicant's compliance 14with the requirements of this Act and rules before issuing a 15hemp food establishment license. 16    Section 30. Operational requirements of hemp food 17establishments. 18    (a) A hemp food establishment that deals in the 19manufacture and sale of food items and that does not comply 20with either the existing State laws related to food handling 21or the health and food handling regulations of a unit of local 22government having jurisdiction over the establishment may be 23enjoined from doing business in the following manner: the 24Department of Public Health or a local department of health 25may seek an injunction in the circuit court of the county in   HB0001- 12 -LRB104 03394 BDA 13416 b1which the establishment is located. An injunction, if granted, 2shall prohibit the hemp food establishment from selling hemp 3cannabinoid products for human ingestion until it complies 4with any applicable State law or regulations of a unit of local 5government. However, no injunction may be sought or granted 6before January 1, 2027, to enforce any rule or regulation 7requiring a licensed food business to adhere to those rules 8and regulations.9    (b) The Department of Public Health shall adopt and 10enforce rules for the manufacturing and processing of hemp 11cannabinoid products for human ingestion at a hemp food 12establishment, and, for that purpose, it may at all times 13enter every building, room, basement, enclosure, or premises 14occupied or used, or suspected of being occupied or used, for 15the production, preparation, manufacture for sale, storage, 16sale, processing, distribution, or transportation and to 17inspect the premises of a hemp food establishment together 18with all utensils, fixtures, furniture, and machinery used for 19the preparation of these products.20    (c) A hemp food establishment shall be under the 21operational supervision of a certified food service sanitation 22manager in accordance with rules adopted under this Act.23    (d) A hemp food establishment shall operate in accordance 24with the representations made in its application and license 25materials. It shall be in compliance with this Act and rules.26    (e) A hemp food establishment shall comply with the food   HB0001- 13 -LRB104 03394 BDA 13416 b1handling, preparation, packaging and labeling provisions of 2the Illinois Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act, the Food Handling 3Regulation Enforcement Act, and the Sanitary Food Preparation 4Act.5    (f) A hemp food establishment that obtains a hemp retailer 6license may prepare and sell ready-to-eat hemp cannabinoid 7products.8    (g) A hemp food establishment shall maintain compliance 9with State and local building, fire, and zoning requirements.10    (h) A hemp food establishment license allows for a hemp 11food establishment to be operated only at a single location.12    (i) A hemp food establishment shall ensure that any 13building or equipment used by the hemp food establishment for 14the storage, preparation, or sale of hemp cannabinoid products 15for human ingestion and ready-to-eat hemp cannabinoid products 16are maintained in a clean and sanitary condition. 17    (j) A hemp food establishment shall be free from 18infestation by insects, rodents, or pests.19    (k) A hemp food establishment, when combined with an 20on-site hemp retailer license, allows for the preparation and 21sale of ready-to-eat hemp cannabinoid products.22    (l) A hemp food establishment license shall not give the 23establishment the right to:24        (1) grow hemp;25        (2) process hemp;26        (3) prepare and sell ready-to-eat hemp cannabinoid   HB0001- 14 -LRB104 03394 BDA 13416 b1    products to a purchaser unless the purchaser has been 2    verified to be 21 years of age or older; or3        (4) violate any other requirements or prohibitions set 4    by the Department of Public Health rules. 5    Section 35. Recipes and dosing of ready-to-eat hemp 6cannabinoid products. In order to sell ready-to-eat hemp 7cannabinoid products, a hemp food establishment shall:8        (1) keep THC dosing at or below 50 milligrams per 9    serving;10        (2) submit a standard operating procedure for dosing 11    to the Department of Public Health for approval and 12    registration. The approval shall be granted within 30 days 13    of submission unless the Department provides good cause, 14    in writing, for withholding approval;15        (3) submit the recipe, at the hemp food 16    establishment's expense, to a third-party testing 17    laboratory for potency testing to ensure 0.3% THC 18    compliance on an annual basis;19        (4) use only the varietal or proportional varietals of 20    ingredients included in the tested recipe for all 21    subsequent batches of the recipe; and22        (5) provide documentation of the annual test results 23    of the recipe submitted under this paragraph upon 24    registration and to an inspector upon request during any 25    inspection authorized by the Department.   HB0001- 15 -LRB104 03394 BDA 13416 b1    Section 40. Disclosure and labeling of ready-to-eat hemp 2cannabinoid products. 3    (a) Hemp food establishments must ensure that the total 4milligram content of each type of cannabinoid exceeding one 5milligram contained in each ready-to-eat hemp cannabinoid menu 6item is listed on the menu adjacent to the name or the price of 7the associated menu item.8    (b) Hemp food establishments must ensure that served 9ready-to-eat hemp cannabinoid menu items include a label that:10        (1) indicates the total milligram content of the 11    served items; and12        (2) provides a QR code for a link to a web page 13    containing a copy of:14            (A) the testing results of the intermediate hemp 15        product used;16            (B) the dosing standard operating procedure; and17            (C) a representative compliance test for the 18        recipe. 19    Section 45. Administrative hearings. 20    (a) Administrative hearings involving licenses issued 21under this Act shall be conducted by the department issuing 22the licenses under the rules that govern formal administrative 23proceedings of the department issuing the licenses. As used in 24this Section, "department issuing the license" means (1) the   HB0001- 16 -LRB104 03394 BDA 13416 b1Department of Financial and Professional Regulation in the 2case of a violation of this Act or rules adopted under this Act 3relating to a hemp retailer or (2) the Department of Public 4Health in the case of a violation of this Act or rules adopted 5under this Act relating to a hemp food establishment.6    (b) The following administrative penalties may be imposed 7by the department issuing the license upon any person or 8entity who violates any provision of this Act or any rule 9adopted by any State department under this Act:10        (1) a penalty of $2,500 for a first violation; 11        (2) a penalty of $5,000 for a second violation at the 12    same location within 2 years of the first violation; and13        (3) a penalty of $10,000 for a third or subsequent 14    violation at the same location within 2 years of the 15    second or subsequent violation.16    Any penalty of $5,000 or greater that is not paid within 17120 days of issuance of notice from the department issuing the 18license shall be submitted to the Department of Revenue for 19collection as provided under the Illinois State Collection Act 20of 1986. The department issuing the license may prohibit any 21person from selling or distributing a hemp cannabinoid product 22for failure to pay an administrative penalty within 60 days of 23issuance of notice from the department. 24    (c) All final administrative decisions of the department 25issuing the license are subject to judicial review under the 26Administrative Review Law. For the purposes of this   HB0001- 17 -LRB104 03394 BDA 13416 b1subsection, "administrative decision" has the meaning given to 2that term in Section 3-101 of the Code of Civil Procedure.